California, session 20252026, AB532.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12087.2 of the Government Code is repealed.SEC. 2. Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 116950) is added to Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 6.6. Water Rate Assistance Program116950. For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a) “Public urban retail water supplier” means a public water supplier that directly provides potable municipal water to more than 3,000 end users or that supplies more than 3,000 acre-feet of potable water annually at retail for municipal purposes. Public urban retail water suppliers are not water corporations pursuant to Section 241 of the Public Utilities Code that are subject to regulation by the Public Utilities Commission.(b) “Urban retail water supplier” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10608.12 of the Water Code.(c) “Water rate assistance” means any offset of the cost of drinking water service provided through a low-income water rate assistance program, including, but not limited to, a reduction in a water bill, a percentage reduction of a water utility bill, a water account credit, or crisis assistance used to reduce or eliminate a water bill arrearage or potential arrearage.116951. (a) A public urban retail water supplier may provide water rate assistance to its ratepayers in furtherance of the state water policy described in Section 106.3 of the Water Code in any manner it determines will best sustainably meet its community’s needs while permitting the efficient administration and distribution of any assistance provided. This includes a supplier having the option of using third parties to administer or provide that assistance.(b) In providing the assistance authorized by this section, a public urban retail water supplier may provide water rate assistance to its residential ratepayers with an annual household income at or below 200 percent of the federal poverty guideline level, residential ratepayers with an arrearage or those likely to have an arrearage without assistance, or to other ratepayers if a supplier determines that offering assistance would allow it to better meet its community’s needs, better administer or provide for a more sustainable program, or better balance competing policy objectives, such as water quality, water efficiency, and water affordability.(c) A public urban retail water supplier, upon approval by the supplier’s governing body, may use any funding it has available to provide water rate assistance to its ratepayers provided it does not use any funding derived from a fee or charge levied pursuant to Article XIII D of the California Constitution.(d) A public urban retail water supplier, upon approval by the supplier’s governing body, may seek and use voluntary contributions of funds from its ratepayers and others to support a water rate assistance program for ratepayers. Voluntary contributions may be sought on a water bill or through any other legal means. means and may be established to allow ratepayers to opt into the program or opt out of the program. Any voluntary contributions of funds a supplier receives shall not be considered public funds.(e) To establish a water rate assistance program pursuant to this chapter, a public urban retail water supplier shall hold a public meeting consistent with Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. (f) This section is declaratory of existing law and shall not be construed to limit the ability of an urban water supplier to adopt a water rate assistance program or similar program under any other law.116952. (a) Beginning January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, an urban retail water supplier shall include in the technical report required by the state board pursuant to Section 116530 all of the following regarding voluntary contributions and water rate assistance:(1) Whether the supplier provides water rate assistance to its customers.(2) The amount of funding used to provide any water rate assistance during the previous reporting period.(3) If the supplier did not provide water rate assistance during the reporting period, an explanation as to any progress made towards implementation of a water rate assistance program, or information about the barriers encountered that prevented providing water rate assistance.(4) Whether the supplier has sought any voluntary contributions to fund its water rate assistance program. If so, the total amount of voluntary contributions collected to fund its water rate assistance program.(5) The total number of eligible households that were provided with water rate assistance.(b) The state board shall, by July 1, 2026, conduct a voluntary survey of urban retail water suppliers relating to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).